src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!! Ojibwe verb morphology                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! The verbs are analysed as follows:
!! * We split the Verb lexicon in 4 groups according to transitivity class
!! * For each group, we add the prefixes, and mark them with ''flag diacritics'' (the @ symbols)
!! * Then come the stems themselves
!! * Finally, come the suffixes, including flag diacritics
!!   to ensure that the correct prefixes and suffixes are matched together

!! Prefixes and suffixes are in affixes/verbs.lexc, whereas
!! the stems are in stems/verbs.lexc


!! The Ojibwe verbs are divided in four groups:

!! # IA: Intransitive animate
!! # II: Intransitive inanimate
!! # TA: Transitive animate
!! # TI: Transitive inanimate


!  ===============
!  ===============
!! !!!The prefixes
!  ===============
!  ===============


LEXICON Verb !!= @CODE@ divides the verbs in four transitivity classes

IA ; ! intransitive animate
II ; ! intransitive inanimate
TA ; ! transitive animate
TI ; ! transitive inanimate


!! !! Intransitive animate
!     ====================

LEXICON IA   !!= @CODE@ divides in independent, subjunctive and imperative

IA_INDEPENDENT ;
IA_SUBJUNCTIV ;
IA_IMPERATIV ;


LEXICON IA_INDEPENDENT   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for person-number in indicative

@U.verb.1sgindep@:ni@U.verb.1sgindep@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.2sgindep@:gi@U.verb.2sgindep@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.3sgindep@:@U.verb.3sgindep@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.3osgindep@:@U.verb.3osgindep@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.3isgindep@:@U.verb.3isgindep@ IASTEM ;

@U.verb.1plindep@:ni@U.verb.1plindep@ IASTEM ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.verb.12plindep@:gi@U.verb.12plindep@ IASTEM ; ! inclusive Pl
@U.verb.2plindep@:gi@U.verb.2plindep@ IASTEM ;   
@U.verb.3plindep@:@U.verb.3plindep@ IASTEM ;

LEXICON IA_SUBJUNCTIV   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for person-number in subjunctive
@U.verb.1sgsbj@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.2sgsbj@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.3sgsbj@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.3osgsbj@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.3isgsbj@ IASTEM ;

@U.verb.1plsbj@  IASTEM ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.verb.12plsbj@  IASTEM ; ! inclusive Pl
@U.verb.2plsbj@  IASTEM ;   
@U.verb.3plsbj@ IASTEM ;


LEXICON IA_IMPERATIV   !!= @CODE@ gives prefixes and flags for person-number in imperative
@U.verb.2sgimp@ IASTEM ;
@U.verb.1plimp@  IASTEM ;   ! exclusive Pl
@U.verb.2plimp@  IASTEM ;   


!! !! Intransitive inanimate
!     ====================

!! These have no prefixes, so we go directly to the __IISTEM__ lexicon.

LEXICON II 
IISTEM ;


!! !! Transitive animate
!     ==================

LEXICON TA  !!= @CODE@ is still not written
 TASTEM_am ;
 TASTEM_aw ;
 ZO ;


!! !! Transitive inanimate
!     ====================

LEXICON TI  !!= @CODE@ is still not written
# ;







!  ===============
!  ===============
!! !!!The suffixes
!  ===============
!  ===============





!! !! Intransitive animate (IA)

LEXICON IACONJ !!= @CODE@ splits in 3 conjugations
+V+IA: IA_IND ;
+V+IA: IA_SBJ ;
+V+IA: IA_IMP ;

LEXICON IA_IND !!= @CODE@ gives positive and negative

            IA_IND_SUFF ;
+Neg:%>siin IA_IND_SUFF ;


LEXICON IA_IND_SUFF !!= @CODE@ (so far) gives present tense only

+Ind+Prs: IA_IND_PRS ;

LEXICON IA_IND_PRS !!= @CODE@ gives person suffixes
+1Sg@U.verb.1sgindep@:0@U.verb.1sgindep@ # ;
+2Sg@U.verb.2sgindep@:0@U.verb.2sgindep@ # ;
+3Sg@U.verb.3sgindep@:0@U.verb.3sgindep@ # ;
+3oSg@U.verb.3osgindep@:@U.verb.3osgindep@%>wan # ;
+3iSg@U.verb.3isgindep@:@U.verb.3isgindep@%>m # ;

+1Pl@U.verb.1plindep@:@U.verb.1plindep@%>min # ;   ! exclusive Pl
+12Pl@U.verb.12plindep@:@U.verb.12plindep@%>min # ; ! inclusive Pl
+2Pl@U.verb.2plindep@:@U.verb.2plindep@%>m # ;
+3Pl@U.verb.3plindep@:@U.verb.3plindep@%>wag # ;


LEXICON IA_SBJ !!= @CODE@ gives flag diacritics and directs to subjunctive person suffixes
@U.verb.1sgsbj@  1sgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.2sgsbj@  2sgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3sgsbj@  3sgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3osgsbj@ 3osgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3isgsbj@ 3isgsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.1plsbj@  1plsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.12plsbj@ 12plsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.2plsbj@  2plsubjunctive ;
@U.verb.3plsbj@  3plsubjunctive ;

LEXICON 1sgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+1Sg:%>yaan #;
+Neg+Sbj+1Sg:%>siwaan  # ;

LEXICON 2sgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+2Sg:%>yan	#;
+Neg+Sbj+2Sg:%>siwan   # ;

LEXICON 3sgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+3Sg:%>d	#;
+Neg+Sbj+3Sg:%>sig	   # ;

LEXICON 3osgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+3oSg:%>nid #;
+Neg+Sbj+3oSg:%>sinid  # ;
+Neg+Sbj+3oSg:%>sinig  # ;

LEXICON 3isgsubjunctive
    +Sbj+3iSg:%>ng #;
+Neg+Sbj+3iSg:%>sing   # ;

LEXICON 1plsubjunctive 
    +Sbj+1Pl:%>yaang #;
+Neg+Sbj+1Pl:%>siwaang # ;

LEXICON 12plsubjunctive
    +Sbj+12Pl:%>yang #;
+Neg+Sbj+12Pl:%>siwang # ;

LEXICON 2plsubjunctive 
    +Sbj+2Pl:%>yeg #;
+Neg+Sbj+2Pl:%>siweg   # ;

LEXICON 3plsubjunctive 
    +Sbj+3Pl:%>waad #;
+Neg+Sbj+3Pl:%>siwaa   # ;



LEXICON IA_IMP  !!= @CODE@ gives flag diacritics and directs to imperative person suffixes
@U.verb.2sgimp@  2sgimp ;
@U.verb.1plimp@  1plimp ;
@U.verb.2plimp@  2plimp ;

LEXICON 2sgimp
+Imp+Imm+2Sg:%>n   # ;
+Imp+Int+2Sg:%>ken # ;
+Imp+Dur+2Sg:%>kan # ;

LEXICON 1plimp
+Imp+Imm+1Pl:%>daa	  # ;
+Imp+Int+1Pl:%>siidaa # ;

LEXICON 2plimp
+Imp+Imm+2Pl:%>k	 # ;
+Imp+Imm+2Pl:%>g	 # ;
+Imp+Int+2Pl:%>kegon # ;
+Imp+Dur+2Pl:%>keg	 # ;



!! !! Intransitive inanimate (II)


LEXICON IICONJ  !!= @CODE@ splits according to conjugation
+V+II+Ind+Prs: II_IND_PRS ;
+V+II+Neg+Ind+Prs: II_NEG_IND_PRS ;
+V+II+Sbj: II_SBJ ;
+V+II+Neg+Sbj: II_NEG_SBJ ;

LEXICON II_IND_PRS   !!= @CODE@ is positive present
+3Sg: # ;
+3oSg:%>ni # ;
+3Pl:%>wan # ;
+3oPl:%>niwan # ;

LEXICON II_NEG_IND_PRS  !!= @CODE@ is negative present
+3Sg:%>siinoon # ;
+3oSg:%>sinini # ;
+3Pl:%>siinoon # ;
+3oPl:%>sininiwan # ;

LEXICON II_SBJ   !!= @CODE@ is positive subjunctive
+3Sg:%>g # ;
+3oSg:%>nig # ;
+3Pl:%>g # ;
+3oPl:%>nig # ;

LEXICON II_NEG_SBJ   !!= @CODE@ is negative subjunctive
+3Sg:%>sinog # ;
+3oSg:%>sininig # ;
+3Pl:%>sinog # ;
+3oPl:%>sininig # ;


!! !! Transitive animate (TA)

LEXICON TACONJ_am  !!= * @CODE@ not yet written
# ;
